Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2109
Certified professional counselor, defined.

Certified professional counselor means a person who is certified to practice professional counseling pursuant to the Uniform Credentialing Act and who holds a current certificate issued by the department.

Laws 1993, LB 669, § 21;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,302;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 728.